New Mexico, session 2026, HB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 30-31-21 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1972, Chapter 84, Section 21, as amended) is amended to read: "30-31-21. DISTRIBUTION TO A MINOR.-- A. Except as authorized by the Controlled Substances Act, no person who is eighteen years of age or older shall intentionally distribute a controlled substance to a person under the age of eighteen years. B. Except as provided in Subsection C of this section, any person who violates this section with respect to a controlled substance enumerated in Schedule I, II, III or IV or a controlled substance analog of any controlled substance enumerated in Schedule I, II, III or IV is: (1) for the first offense, guilty of a second degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978; and (2) for the second and subsequent offenses, guilty of a first degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. C. A person who violates this section with respect to a controlled substance enumerated in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or a controlled substance analog of a controlled substance enumerated in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug, methamphetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of isomers as enumerated in Schedule II or a controlled substance analog of methamphetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of isomers is guilty of a first degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978." - 2 -